Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 18
COLLEGE OPPORTUNITY FUND AND
HIGHER EDUCATION FUNDING

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2004 act enacting this article, see section 1 of chapter 215, Session Laws of Colorado 2004.

Section

PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 COLLEGE OPPORTUNITY FUND PROGRAM

PART 3 HIGHER EDUCATION FUNDING